Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3823.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin MEAT CUTTING GRANTS; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin (a) $225,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development to provide grants to secondary career and technical education programs to offer instruction in meat cutting and butchery. This is a onetime appropriation. Grants may be used for costs, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) equipment required for a meat cutting program; new text end new text begin (2) facility renovation to accommodate meat cutting; and new text end new text begin (3) training faculty to teach the fundamentals of meat processing. new text end new text begin (b) A grant recipient may be awarded a grant of up to $75,000 and may use up to ten percent of the grant for faculty training. new text end new text begin (c) Priority may be given to applicants who are coordinating with meat cutting and butchery programs at Minnesota State Colleges and Universities institutions or with local industry partners. new text end new text begin (d) By January 15, 2028, the commissioner must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over agriculture finance, education finance, and workforce development finance a list of the grants, including the amount awarded to each grantee, made under this section by county and note the number and amount of grant requests not fulfilled. The report may include additional information as determined by the commissioner, including but not limited to information regarding the outcomes produced by these grants. If additional grants are awarded under this section that were not covered in the report due by January 15, 2028, the commissioner must submit an additional report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over agriculture finance, education finance, and workforce development finance regarding all grants issued under this section by November 1, 2028. new text end new text begin (e) The Department of Employment and Economic Development may enter into an interagency agreement with the Department of Agriculture, including agreements to transfer funds, to administer the program. new text end